Washington statutes.
RCW 43.163.040

Farmers—Advance financing, agriculture conservation reserve program.

To provide capital for economic development purposes, the authority is authorized to develop and conduct a program or programs to provide advance financing to eligible farmers in respect of the contract payments due to them under the federal department of agriculture conservation reserve program. Such advance financing may be provided in the form of lease, sale, loan or other similar financing transactions.

[ 1989 c 279 s 5.]